Tennessee statutes. Title 5 Counties
Part 4

Unclaimed Funds

5-8-401. Disposition.

The county mayor is required, in making settlements with clerks, to ascertain what amount of money is in their hands due to witnesses and officers, that may have been collected by them from suitors, and that has been in the hands of the clerk for more than two (2) years, and such sums of money shall be paid into the county treasury as other county revenue.

Code 1858, § 521 (deriv. Acts 1845-1846, ch. 32, § 1); Shan., § 661; Code 1932, § 1060; Acts 1939, ch. 193, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 1060; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-821; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Section 521 of the 1858 Code was probably superseded by Acts 1891, ch. 227, requiring such money to be paid into the state treasury after six years, but such act was repealed by Acts 1893, ch. 65 and § 521 specifically revived and reenacted.

This section may be affected by the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act compiled in title 66, ch. 29.

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Application to excess fees, § 8-22-108.

Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 12; 6 Tenn. Juris., Constitutional Law, § 79; 8 Tenn. Juris., Costs, § 43.

5-8-402. Records and reports.

The several clerks shall, upon oath, produce their books and papers, and point out to the county mayor the items so collected by them and remaining in their hands, mentioned in § 5-8-401; and the county mayor shall examine the books minutely, and interrogate the clerks with a view to elicit the facts, and shall report thereon.

The county mayor shall include with the report a list of the persons to whom money remaining in the hands of the clerk is due, and the amount due, and the county clerk shall spread the same in full in a record book kept for this purpose.

Code 1858, §§ 522, 523 (deriv. Acts 1845-1846, ch. 32, §§ 2, 4); Shan., §§ 662, 663; Code 1932, §§ 1061, 1062; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-822; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act compiled in title 66, ch. 29.

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 12; 6 Tenn. Juris., Constitutional Law, § 79.

5-8-403. Payment to claimant.

The person to whom any money paid into the county treasury is due may apply to the county mayor for a warrant for the amount due that person, and, on presenting this warrant to the county trustee, the county trustee shall pay the amount, as in other cases, out of any money in the treasury.

Code 1858, § 524 (deriv. Acts 1845-1846, ch. 32, § 6); Shan., § 664; Code 1932, § 1063; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-823; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act compiled in title 66, ch. 29.

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 12; 6 Tenn. Juris., Constitutional Law, § 79.

5-8-404. Unclaimed funds from appellate courts.

This part shall apply to clerks of the appeals and supreme courts, who are required to pay over to the county mayor of the county in which the suits originated, as other county revenue, on the first day of January, April, July, and October of each year, all moneys in their hands due to witnesses, officers, litigants, or others, that may have been collected by the clerk from suitors or from the state and county treasury, and that have been in court for more than two (2) years.

Acts 1895, ch. 137, § 1; Shan., § 665; mod. Code 1932, § 1064; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-824; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act compiled in title 66, ch. 29.

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 12; 6 Tenn. Juris., Constitutional Law, § 79.